South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 59-1-425, the governing body of a school district may waive the requirement that public schools make up full days missed due to inclement weather for public schools in the districts that were closed due to inclement weather associated with Hurricane Helene during the 2024-2025 School Year. When a district waives a make-up day pursuant to this section, the make-up day also is waived for home schooling programs in the district that have been approved by the board of trustees and to charter schools in the district. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----